Utah statutes.
78B-11-119.   Judicial enforcement of preaward ruling by arbitrator.
If an arbitrator makes a preaward ruling in favor of a party to the
arbitration proceeding, the party may request the arbitrator to incorporate
the ruling into an award under Section 78B-11-120.  A prevailing party may
make a motion to the court for an expedited order to confirm the award under
Section 78B-11-123, in which case the court shall summarily decide the motion.
The court shall issue an order to confirm the award unless the court vacates,
modifies, or corrects the award under Section 78B-11-124 or 78B-11-125.
